Idaho, session 2025, H0347.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of the Secretary of State the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed fund for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. SECRETARY OF STATE:
FROM:
General
Fund $36,500 $396,100 $29,000 $461,600
II. COMMISSION ON UNIFORM STATE LAWS:
FROM:
General
Fund $6,700 $6,700
GRAND TOTAL $36,500 $402,800 $29,000 $468,300
SECTION 2. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. There is hereby reappropriated
to the Office of the Secretary of State any unexpended and unencumbered bal-
ance appropriated to the Office of the Secretary of State for election in-
tegrity audits and elections system upgrades for fiscal year 2025 for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller
shall confirm the reappropriation amounts, by fund, expense class, and pro-
gram, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappro-
priation authorized herein.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.